src/acro-kal-lex.txt
! ========= !
! Akronymer og adresser!
! ========= !

LEXICON Akronymer

Akronymnumeralier ; ! Nogle tal först, måskje

FIRSTLETTER ;  ! Dynamically generated acronyms, 	!^C^ Remove these from nonrec?
               ! between two and four letters long.
LETTERNUMBER ; ! Listed (still not monitored)		!^C^
               ! Perhaps we should allow for a final arabic number at
               ! the end of the acronyms, the NRK and NRK2 pattern.
SOMELONGACRO ; ! Here, we collect some long acronyms, perhaps we should  !^C^
               ! open for dynamic generation of longer acronyms, if this 
               ! list gets long.
smallacro ;    ! This is a pointer to a lexicon of manually listed small-letter
               ! acronyms. They are not generated, since it would interfer with the
               ! ordinary transducer, but listed here, as they then can point to the
               ! same ACRO lexicon as the generated capital-letter acronyms.
mailnavn ;     ! Pers hovedpine


!En mail-adresse automat i 4 lexica

LEXICON mailnavn
< [a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|%-|%.] > snabel-a ;

LEXICON snabel-a
     mailnavn ;
%@      mailserver ;

LEXICON mailserver
< [a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|%-|%.] >
mailadresse ;

LEXICON mailadresse
       mailserver ;
+Mailadresse:   # ;



LEXICON Akronymnumeralier
%0 anl ; 1 anl ; 2 anl ; 3 anl ; 4 anl ; 5 anl ; 6 anl ; 7 anl ; 8 anl ; 9 anl ; 

LEXICON anl ! akronymloop
     Akronymnumeralier ; ! loop
     FIRSTLETTER ;       ! Over til bogstaverne
 :%- FIRSTLETTER ;       ! ... med stræg først

!PL 7.10.2006: Tilfoejet det i groenlandsk saa vigtige bogstav Q 
LEXICON FIRSTLETTER	!^C^
B SCND ; C SCND ; D  SCND ; F  SCND ; G  SCND ; 	!^C^
H SCND ; J SCND ; K  SCND ; L  SCND ; M  SCND ; N  SCND ; !^C^
P SCND ; Q SCND ; R SCND ; S  SCND ; T  SCND ; V  SCND ; 	!^C^
W SCND ; X SCND ; Z  SCND ; 								!^C^
A SCND ; E  SCND ; I  SCND ; O  SCND ; U  SCND ; 			!^C^
Æ SCND ; Ø SCND ; Y  SCND ; Ä  SCND ; Ö  SCND ; Å  SCND ; 			!^C^

!PL 7.10.2006: Opdelt leksika i bogstaver med vokalisk udlyd 'SCND' og med konsonantisk udlyd 'SCND_C'
!for at kunne haandtere forskelle som EF-imi vs. YK-mi	

LEXICON SCND		!^C^
B THRD ; C THRD ; D THRD ; F THRD_C ; G THRD ; 	!^C^
H THRD ; J THRD_C ; K THRD ; L THRD_C ; M THRD_C ; N THRD_C ; !^C^
P THRD ; Q THRD ; R THRD_C ; S THRD_C ; T THRD ; V THRD ; 	!^C^
W THRD ; X THRD_C ; Z THRD_C ; 								!^C^
A THRD ; Á THRD ; E THRD ; I THRD ; O THRD ; U THRD ; 			!^C^
Æ THRD ; Ø THRD ; Y THRD ; Ä THRD ; Ö THRD ; Å THRD ; 			!^C^
%- arabiskeefterkomma ; arabiskeefterkomma ; !^C^ ! N-9520 Kárášjohka

LEXICON THRD			!^C^
B FRTH ; C FRTH ; D  FRTH ; F  FRTH_C ; G  FRTH ; 	!^C^
H FRTH ; J FRTH_C ; K  FRTH ; L  FRTH_C ; M  FRTH_C ; N  FRTH_C ; 	!^C^
P FRTH ; Q FRTH ; R FRTH_C ; S  FRTH_C ; T  FRTH ; V  FRTH ; 	!^C^
W FRTH ; X FRTH_C ; Z  FRTH_C ; Ž FRTH_C ; 								!^C^
A FRTH ; Á FRTH ; E  FRTH ; I  FRTH ; O  FRTH ; U  FRTH ; 			!^C^
Æ FRTH ; Ø FRTH ; Y  FRTH ; Ä  FRTH ; Ö  FRTH ; Å  FRTH ; 			!^C^
  ACRO ;
				!^C^
LEXICON THRD_C			!^C^
B FRTH ; C FRTH ; D  FRTH ; F  FRTH_C ; G  FRTH ; 	!^C^
H FRTH ; J FRTH_C ; K  FRTH ; L  FRTH_C ; M  FRTH_C ; N  FRTH_C ; 	!^C^
P FRTH ; Q FRTH ; R FRTH_C ; S  FRTH_C ; T  FRTH ; V  FRTH ; 	!^C^
W FRTH ; X FRTH_C ; Z  FRTH_C ; Ž FRTH_C ; 								!^C^
A FRTH ; Á FRTH ; E  FRTH ; I  FRTH ; O  FRTH ; U  FRTH ; 			!^C^
Æ FRTH ; Ø FRTH ; Y  FRTH ; Ä  FRTH ; Ö  FRTH ; Å  FRTH ; 			!^C^
  ACRO_C ;				!^C^

LEXICON FRTH			!^C^
B FFTH ; C FFTH ; D  FFTH ; F  FFTH_C ; G  FFTH ; 	!^C^
H FFTH ; J FFTH_C ; K  FFTH ; L  FFTH_C ; M  FFTH_C ; N  FFTH_C ;  	!^C^
P FFTH ; Q FFTH ; R FFTH_C ; S  FFTH_C ; T  FFTH ;  V  FFTH ; 	!^C^
W FFTH ; X FFTH_C ; Z  FFTH_C ; 								!^C^
A FFTH ; Á FFTH ; E  FFTH ; I  FFTH ; O  FFTH ; U  FFTH ; 			!^C^
Æ FFTH ; Ø FFTH ; Y  FFTH ; Ä  FFTH ; Ö  FFTH ; Å  FFTH  ; 			!^C^
ACRO ;				!^C^
! # ; !To prevent cases like :as, `as and as. But this gives tagless 3-letter ACR.

LEXICON FRTH_C			!^C^
B FFTH ; C FFTH ; D  FFTH ; F  FFTH_C ; G  FFTH ; 	!^C^
H FFTH ; J FFTH_C ; K  FFTH ; L  FFTH_C ; M  FFTH_C ; N  FFTH_C ;  	!^C^
P FFTH ; Q FFTH ; R FFTH_C ; S  FFTH_C ; T  FFTH ;  V  FFTH ; 	!^C^
W FFTH ; X FFTH_C ; Z  FFTH_C ; 								!^C^
A FFTH ; Á FFTH ; E  FFTH ; I  FFTH ; O  FFTH ; U  FFTH ; 			!^C^
Æ FFTH ; Ø FFTH ; Y  FFTH ; Ä  FFTH ; Ö  FFTH ; Å  FFTH  ; 			!^C^
ACRO_C ;				!^C^
! # ; !To prevent cases like :as, `as and as. But this gives tagless 3-letter ACR.

LEXICON FFTH			!^C^
B ACRO ; C ACRO ; D  ACRO ; F  ACRO_C ; G  ACRO ; 	!^C^
H ACRO ; J ACRO_C ; K  ACRO ; L  ACRO_C ; M  ACRO_C ; N  ACRO_C ;  	!^C^
P ACRO ; Q ACRO ; R ACRO_C ; S  ACRO_C ; T  ACRO ;  V  ACRO ; 	!^C^
W ACRO ; X ACRO_C ; Z  ACRO_C ; 								!^C^
A ACRO ; Á ACRO ; E  ACRO ; I  ACRO ; O  ACRO ; U  ACRO ; 			!^C^
Æ ACRO ; Ø ACRO ; Y  ACRO ; Ä  ACRO ; Ö  ACRO ; Å  ACRO  ; 			!^C^
ACRO ;
			!^C^
LEXICON FFTH_C			!^C^
B ACRO ; C ACRO ; D  ACRO ; F  ACRO_C ; G  ACRO ; 	!^C^
H ACRO ; J ACRO_C ; K  ACRO ; L  ACRO_C ; M  ACRO_C ; N  ACRO_C ;  	!^C^
P ACRO ; Q ACRO ; R ACRO_C ; S  ACRO_C ; T  ACRO ;  V  ACRO ; 	!^C^
W ACRO ; X ACRO_C ; Z  ACRO_C ; 								!^C^
A ACRO ; Á ACRO ; E  ACRO ; I  ACRO ; O  ACRO ; U  ACRO ; 			!^C^
Æ ACRO ; Ø ACRO ; Y  ACRO ; Ä  ACRO ; Ö  ACRO ; Å  ACRO  ; 			!^C^
ACRO_C ;				!^C^


LEXICON LETTERNUMBER 
1%.%g	ACRO ;
2%.%g	ACRO ;
3%.%g	ACRO ;
A/S ACRO ;
a/s ACRO ;
O97S ACRO ;
Bb ACRO ;
Jk1 ACRO ;
NRK1 ACRO ;
NRK2 ACRO ;
TV2 ACRO ;
E6 ACRO ;
L-97 ACRO ;
LA21 ACRO ;
O-97 ACRO ;
P1 ACRO ; 
P2 ACRO ; 
P3 ACRO ; 
P4 ACRO ; 
P-1 ACRO ; 
P-2 ACRO ; 
P-3 ACRO ; 
P-4 ACRO ; 
Q-2 ACRO ;
T5PC ACRO ;
! Here, we need a good regex for
! letter - number combination.

LEXICON SOMELONGACRO		!^C^
EXFACFON ACRO_C ;			!^C^
EXFACHS ACRO_C ;			!^C^
NAMMCO ACRO ;
KANUKOKA ACRO ;
NASCO ACRO ;
NSR-N ACRO_C ;
POST	ACRO_C ;
TELE-POST	ACRO_C ;
AVIT	ACRO_C ;

LEXICON smallacro
as ACRO ; !A/S
cd ACRO ;
tv ACRO ;

LEXICON ACRO               
%- arabiskeefterkomma ;               ! Here we dive over to the numerals, 
    arabiskeefterkomma ;               ! Here we dive over to the numerals
+N+ACR: acroconnector ;    ! Here we add the POS tag and go ACRO

LEXICON ACRO_C               
%- arabiskeefterkomma ;               ! Here we dive over to the numerals, 
    arabiskeefterkomma ;               ! Here we dive over to the numerals
+N+ACR: acroconnector_C ;    ! Here we add the POS tag and go ACRO

LEXICON acroconnector  
:%- Naalsuf ;             
+Abs: # ;

LEXICON acroconnector_C  
:%-i Naalsuf ;             
+Abs: # ;
